District of Columbia statutes.
2-1554

Biannual assessment and funding report.

The Children and Youth Investment Corporation, or a successor single non-service provider, nonprofit organization, shall submit a biannual assessment and funding report to the Council, which includes:

(1)

A research-based needs assessment of at-risk youth, which identifies:

(A)

Available resources;

(B)

Needed resources, if any; and

(C)

Any gap in services; and

(2)

A list of funding priorities based upon the needs assessment.

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 2404a
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5061(b), 57 DCR 181
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5061(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5061(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).